incubator/apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
    <pardef n="nakt/s__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ij</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ī</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šu</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īm</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īm</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īm</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>īs</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>s<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>
